Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.350

Corporate name of foreign corporation.

The corporate name of a foreign corporation registered in this state must comply with the provisions of RCW 23.95.525 and Article 3 of chapter 23.95 RCW.

[ 2015 c 176 s 4119; 1982 c 35 s 143; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 70.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.

Registration of corporate name: RCW 24.06.047.

Reservation of exclusive right to use corporate name: RCW 24.06.046.